Washington statutes.
RCW 41.47.030

Operation of statute limited.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall deprive any person of benefits under any existing pension system, nor repeal, amend, modify or supersede any law, charter amendment or ordinance establishing or pertaining to an existing pension system.

[ 1941 c 205 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 9998-59. Formerly RCW 74.40.030.]